Maine, session 132, LD676.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Provides a one-time allocation to go toward the replacement of the tracks on the
31 miles of the rail corridor between the towns of Fryeburg and Standish per the
recommendations of the Mountain Division Rail Use Advisory Council.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $500 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $0